District of Columbia statutes.
10-138

Authority to make rules and regulations for care of public grounds — Extension of sidewalks and carriageways.

The application of the rules and regulations prescribed prior to March 4, 1909, or that may be thereafter prescribed by the Director of the National Park Service, under the authority granted by §§ 6-404, 10-104, 10-106, 10-123, 10-129 and 10-137, for the government and proper care of all public grounds placed by that act under the charge and control of the said Director of the National Park Service, is hereby extended to cover the sidewalks around the public grounds and the carriageways of such streets as lie between and separate the said public grounds.

History

Mar. 4, 1909, 35 Stat. 994, ch. 299, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-138.
1973 Ed., § 8-144.

Transfer of Functions

The functions of the Director of the National Park Service relating to public buildings were transferred to the Federal Works Administrator by § 303 (b) of Reorganization Plan No. I, July 1, 1939, 4 F.R. 2729, 53 Stat. 1427. All functions of all officers of the Department of the Interior (including the Director of the National Park Service) and all functions of all agencies and employees of such Department were, with 2 exceptions, transferred to the Secretary of the Interior, with power vested in him to authorize their performance or the performance of any of his functions by any of such officers, agencies, and employees, by 1950 Reorganization Plan No. 3, §§ 1, 2, 15 F.R. 3174, 64 Stat. 1262. All functions of the Federal Works Agency and of all agencies thereof, together with all functions of the Federal Works Administrator, and all functions of the Commissioner of Public Buildings and the Public Buildings Administration, were transferred to the Administrator of General Services by § 103(a) of the Act of June 30, 1949, 63 Stat. 380, ch. 288. The Federal Works Agency, the Office of Federal Works Administrator, the Office of Commissioner of Public Buildings, and the Public Buildings Administration, were abolished by § 103(b) of said Act. All functions with respect to acquiring space in buildings by lease and all functions with respect to assigning and reassigning space in buildings for use by agencies (including both space acquired by lease and space in government-owned buildings), were, with certain exceptions, transferred from the respective agencies in which theretofore vested to the Administrator of General Services by §  1 of 1950 Reorganization Plan No. 18, 15 F.R. 3177, 64 Stat. 1270.